North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Part 2. Other Military and Overseas Voters Absentee Provisions.

§ 163-258.26.
Certified list of approved military-overseas ballot applications; record of ballots received; disposition of list; list constitutes registration.

Preparation of List. — The chair of the county board of elections shall prepare, or cause to be prepared, a list in quadruplicate of all military-overseas ballots returned to the county board of elections under this Article to be counted which have been
approved by the county board of elections. At the end of the list the chair shall execute the following certificate under oath: “State of North CarolinaCounty of _______________ I, _______________ , Chair of the _______________
County Board of Elections, do hereby certify that the foregoing is a list of all executed military-overseas ballots to be voted in the election to be conducted on the _______________ day of _______________ , _______________
, which have been approved by the County Board of Elections. I further certify that I have issued ballots to no other persons than those listed herein and further that I have not delivered military-overseas ballots to persons other
than those listed herein; that this list constitutes the only precinct registration of covered voters whose names have not heretofore been entered on the regular registration of the appropriate precinct.

Click to view

Distribution of List. — No earlier than 3:00 P.M. on the day before the election and no later than 10:00 A.M. on election day, the chair shall cause one copy of the list of executed military-overseas ballots, which may be a continuing countywide list
or a separate list for each precinct, to be immediately deposited as first-class mail to the State Board of Elections. The chair shall retain one copy in the board office for public inspection and shall cause two copies of the
appropriate precinct list to be delivered to the chief judge of each precinct in the county. The chief judge shall post one copy in the voting place and retain one copy until all challenges of absentee ballots have been heard by
the county board of elections. Challenges shall be made as provided in

G.S. 163-89

.After receipt of the list of absentee voters required by this section the chief judge shall call the name of each person recorded on the list and enter an “A” in the appropriate voting square on the voter’s permanent
registration record, if any, or a similar entry on the computer list used at the polls. If such person is already recorded as having voted in that election, the chief judge shall enter a challenge which shall be presented to the
chair of the county board of elections for resolution by the board of elections prior to certification of results by the board.

List Constitutes Registration. — The “List of Applicants for Military-Overseas Ballots to Whom Ballots Have Been Issued” prescribed by this section, when delivered to the chief judges of the various precincts, shall constitute the only precinct registration
of the covered voters listed thereon whose names are not already entered in the registration records of the appropriate precinct. Chief judges shall not add the names of persons listed on the covered voters list to the regular
registration books of their precincts.

Counting Ballots, Hearing Challenges. — The county board of elections shall count military-overseas ballots as provided for civilian absentee ballots in

G.S. 163-234

, and shall hear challenges as provided in

G.S. 163-89

.

This the day of , . (Signature of Chair of County Board of Elections) Sworn to and subscribed before me this day of , . (Signature of Officer administering oath) (Title of officer)’’

History.
1941, c. 346, ss. 7-10, 12, 13; 1943, c. 503, ss. 4, 5; 1963, c. 457, s. 15; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1973, c. 536, s. 2; 1977, c. 265, s. 17; 1979, c. 797, s. 3; 1981, c. 155, s. 2; c. 308, s. 3; 1983, c. 331, s. 4; 1993 (Reg.
Sess., 1994), c. 762, ss. 56, 57; 1999-456, s. 59; 2011-182, s. 2; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-258.27.
Article inapplicable to persons after change of status; reregistration not required.

An individual who no longer qualifies as a covered voter under the provisions of this Article shall not be entitled subsequently to vote by military-overseas ballot under this Article, but if the covered voter was registered under the provisions of this
Article that voter’s registration shall remain valid for the remainder of the calendar year that voter registered, and that voter shall be entitled to vote in any primary or election for the remainder of the calendar year without having
to reregister. If requested by election officials, the voter shall present proof of military status at the time of registration. This section does not entitle a person to vote in North Carolina if that person has become disqualified
because of change of permanent residence to another State or because of conviction of a felony.

History.
1943, c. 503, s. 12; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1999-424, s. 7(k); 2001-466, s. 4(e); 2011-182, s. 2; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-258.28.
Registration and voting on primary or election day.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Chapter, an individual shall be permitted to register in person at any time the office of the board of elections or the voting place is open, including the day of a primary or election if that individual was
absent on the day the registration records close for an election, but returns to that individual’s county of residence in North Carolina thereafter, and if the absence is due to uniformed service as defined by

G.S. 163-258.2

.

If an individual so absent on the day registration closes shall appear in person at the voting place on election day and is otherwise eligible to vote, that individual shall be entitled to register and vote at the voting place that day, regardless of
whether the person’s uniformed service status has changed since the close of registration.

History.
1977, c. 93; 1999-424, s. 7(l); 2001-353, s. 3; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-182, s. 2; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-258.29.
Absentee voting at office of board of elections.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Chapter, any covered voter under this Article shall be permitted to vote an absentee ballot pursuant to

G.S. 163-227.2

, 163-227.5, and 163-227.6 if the covered voter has not already voted an absentee ballot which has been returned to the board of elections, and if the covered voter will not be in the county on the day of the primary
or election.

In the event an absentee application or ballot has already been mailed to the covered voter applying to vote pursuant to

G.S. 163-227.2

, 163-227.5, and 163-227.6, the board of elections shall void the application and ballot unless the voted absentee ballot has been received by the board of elections. The covered voter shall be eligible to vote pursuant
to

G.S. 163-227.2

, 163-227.5, and 163-227.6 no later than 5:00 P.M. on the day next preceding the primary, second primary or election.

History.
1977, c. 93; 1979, c. 797, s. 4; 2011-182, s. 2; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-144, s. 3.4(l); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-258.30.
Regulations of State Board of Elections.

The State Board of Elections shall adopt rules and regulations to carry out the intent and purpose of

G.S. 163-258.28

and

G.S. 163-258.29

and to ensure that a proper list of persons voting under said sections shall be maintained by the boards of elections, and to ensure proper registration records.

The State Board of Elections shall be the single office responsible for providing information concerning voter registration and absentee voting procedures to be used by covered voters as to all elections and procedures relating to the use of federal write-in
absentee ballots. Unless otherwise required by law, the State Board of Elections shall be responsible for maintaining contact and cooperation with the Federal Voting Assistance Program, the United States Department of Defense,
and other federal entities that deal with military and overseas voting. The State Board of Elections shall, as needed, make recommendations concerning military and overseas citizen voting to the General Assembly, the Governor,
and other State officials.

History.
1977, c. 93; 1987, c. 827, s. 1; 2003-226, s. 18; 2011-182, s. 2; 2012-194, s. 37; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b), 4.5(g).

§ 163-258.31.
Emergency powers.

If an international, national, or local emergency or other situation arises that makes substantial compliance with this Article or the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act impossible or unreasonable, the State Board of Elections may prescribe,
by emergency rule, such special procedures or requirements as may be necessary to facilitate absentee voting by those absent uniformed services voters or overseas voters directly affected who are eligible to vote in this State. The
rule shall become effective when filed with the Codifier of Rules.

History.
2009-537, s. 9; 2011-182, s. 2; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).